Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.56.100

Chapter designated "bank stabilization act."

This chapter shall be known as the bank stabilization act.

[ 1955 c 33 s 30.56.100. Prior: 1933 c 49 s 1; RRS s 3293-1. Formerly RCW 30.56.100.]